Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-204
Contingent fee contract; executed by constitutional agency; void; exception.

Any contingent fee contract of any kind whatsoever reasonably anticipated to result in the payment of a contingent fee or fees in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars per annum executed by (1) the University of Nebraska, (2) the Nebraska state colleges, or (3) any other board, commission, or agency established by the Constitution of Nebraska after September 9, 1995, is void unless executed by the highest executive officer thereof upon thirty days' notice to the public at large.

Laws 1995, LB 519, § 3.